Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,171
Railroad crossing stop signs; jurisdiction.

The Department of Transportation and local authorities on highways under their respective jurisdictions may designate particularly dangerous highway grade crossings of railroads and erect stop signs at the crossings. When such stop signs are erected, the driver of any vehicle shall stop within fifty feet but not less than fifteen feet from the nearest rail of such railroad and shall proceed only upon exercising due care.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 56;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-656;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 267;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 209.